New Jersey, session 221, A4406.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    A person shall not knowingly, with purpose to expose another to harassment or risk of harm to life or property, or in reckless disregard of the probability of such exposure, post or publish on the Internet the home address or unpublished home telephone number of any member of the Armed Forces of the United States or the New Jersey National Guard or a spouse or child of any member of the Armed Forces of the United States or the New Jersey National Guard.  A reckless violation of this section is a crime of the fourth degree.  A purposeful violation of this section is a crime of the third degree. 2.    A State or local governmental agency shall not knowingly post or publish on the Internet the home address or unpublished home telephone number of any member of the Armed Forces of the United States or the New Jersey National Guard without first obtaining the written permission of that member. 3.    a.   A person, business, or association shall not disclose on the Internet the home address or unpublished home telephone number of a member of the Armed Forces of the United States or the New Jersey National Guard under circumstances in which a reasonable person would believe that providing that information would expose another to harassment or risk of harm to life or property. b.    A person, business, or association that violates subsection a. of this section shall be liable to the member of the Armed Forces of the United States or the New Jersey National Guard, or any other person residing at the home address of the member of the Armed Forces of the United States or the New Jersey National Guard, who may bring a civil action in the Superior Court. c.     The court may award: (1)   actual damages, but not less than liquidated damages computed at the rate of $1,000 for each violation of this act; (2)   punitive damages upon proof of willful or reckless disregard of the law; (3)   reasonable attorneys fees and other litigation costs reasonably incurred; and (4)   any other preliminary and equitable relief as the court determines to be appropriate. d.    For the purposes of this section, disclose shall mean to solicit, sell, manufacture, give, provide, lend, trade, mail, deliver, transfer, publish, distribute, circulate, disseminate, present, exhibit, advertise, or offer. 4.    This act shall take effect immediately.